District of Columbia statutes.
38-274.02

HEI scholarship program.

(a)

In addition to awarding HEI grants, the University of the District of Columbia may establish and administer a scholarship-award program for qualified individuals who have an interest in the pre-k education field. In exchange for a commitment to teach in the pre-k-education system in the District for 3 years, the University of the District of Columbia may provide a scholarship to the HEI program, as well as a stipend, to a qualified applicant.

(b)

(1)

A qualified applicant shall be an individual who has graduated from college within 3 years of submission of the application.

(2)

A preference shall be given to individuals who:

(A)

Are domiciled in the District;

(B)

Graduated from a District college or university; or

(C)

Commit to be domiciled in the District within 180 days of accepting a scholarship.

(c)

An individual who accepts the scholarship and fails to fulfill the 3-year commitment shall be required to repay the scholarship.

History

July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-202, § 402, 55 DCR 6297
Mar. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-285, § 2(h), 57 DCR 11005

Section References

This section is referenced in § 38-271.01.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-285, in subsec. (a), substituted “grants” for “grants to pre-k teachers and assistant teachers” and “the University of the District of Columbia” for “OSSE”.

Temporary Amendment of Section

Section 2(i) of D.C. Law 18-142 deleted “to pre-k teachers and assistant teachers”; and substituted “the University of the District of Columbia” for “OSSE” both times it appears.
Section 5(a) of D.C. Law 18-142 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(i) of Pre-K Acceleration and Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-304, January 28, 2010, 57 DCR 1475).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(h) of Pre-k Acceleration and Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-602, December 1, 2010, 57 DCR 11039).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(h) of Pre-k Acceleration and Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 19-4, February 11, 2011, 58 DCR 1399).